Hawaii, session 2025, HB650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the popularity of Hawaii-made sea salt products is on the rise.  Sea salt products colored with Hawaiian charcoal, volcanic clay, and other natural ingredients help to promote the State's businesses. The legislature further finds that incorporating the United States Food and Drug Administration's industry guidance on the use of color additives in sea salt products should be a state priority.  The guidance indicates that sea salt manufacturers who intend to use color additives that are not currently approved for food use should first obtain approval through the United States Food and Drug Administration's color additive petition process. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to ensure the continued viability of the State's sea salt manufacturing industry by appropriating funds to provide education and support to local businesses regarding the United States Food and Drug Administration's guidance on colored sea salt. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for providing education and support to local businesses regarding the United States Food and Drug Administration's guidance on colored sea salt. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.